pt-PT: Componentes da gaiola de rebatidas incluídos: Kit de fixação; Rede de amortecimento; Saco de transporte; Estrutura; Estacas de fixação; Ferragens de instalação; Rede; Arnês da máquina de lançamentos; Postes; Outro
de: Enthaltene Schlagkäfigkomponenten: Befestigungs-Set; Prallnetz; Tragetasche; Rahmen; Erdnägel; Montagematerial; Netz; Pitching-Maschinen-Gurt; Stangen; Sonstige
en: Batting cage components included: Anchor kit; Baffle net; Carry bag; Frame; Ground stakes; Installation hardware; Net; Pitching machine harness; Poles; Other
vi: Các bộ phận lồng tập đánh bóng đi kèm: Bộ neo cố định; Lưới chắn; Túi đựng; Khung; Cọc cắm đất; Trang thiết bị lắp đặt; Lưới; Dây đai máy ném bóng; Cột; Khác
tr: Vuruş kafesi dahil bileşenler: Sabitleme kiti; Sönümleyici ağ; Taşıma çantası; Çerçeve; Zemin kazıkları; Kurulum donanımı; Ağ; Atış makinesi askısı; Direkler; Diğer
nl: Inbegrepen slagkooionderdelen: Verankeringsset; Baffle-net; Draagtas; Frame; Grondpennen; Installatie-hardware; Net; Harnas voor pitchingmachine; Palen; Overig
th: ส่วนประกอบของกรงฝึกตีเบสบอล: ชุดสมอบก; ตาข่ายกันกระแทก; กระเป๋าพกพา; โครง; หมุดปักดิน; ฮาร์ดแวร์สำหรับติดตั้ง; ตาข่าย; สายรัดเครื่องขว้างลูก; เสา; อื่นๆ
da: Batting cage-tilbehør medfølger: Forankringssæt; Baffle-net; Bæretaske; Ramme; Jordpløkker; Monteringsudstyr; Net; Sele til boldmaskine; Stænger; Andet
hu: Az ütőketrec tartozékai: Rögzítőkészlet; Ütközőháló; Hordozótáska; Keret; Rögzítőcövekek; Szerelvények; Háló; Adogatógép-hám; Oszlopok; Egyéb
lt-LT: Į komplektą įeinantys apsaugotos beisbolo treniruočių aikštelės komponentai: Tvirtinimo rinkinys; Apsauginis tinklas; Nešiojimo krepšys; Rėmas; Tvirtinimo kuoliukai; Montavimo įranga; Tinklas; Kamuoliukų svaidymo mašinos diržai; Stulpai; Kita
bg-BG: С включени компоненти за тренировъчни клетки: Комплект за закрепване; Мрежа за омекотяване на удари; Чанта за носене; Рамка; Колчета за забиване; Хардуер за монтаж; Мрежа; Сбруя за машина за хвърляне; Пръти; Друго
zh-CN: 包含击球笼组件: 锚固套件; 挡板网; 手提袋; 框架; 地桩; 安装硬件; 网; 发球机固定带; 支杆; 其他
sl-SI: Priložene komponente za kletko za odbijanje: Komplet za pritrditev; Odbojna mreža; Torba za prenašanje; Okvir; Talni klini; Okovje za namestitev; Mreža; Pas za metalno napravo; Palice; Drugo
fi: Mukaan sisältyvät lyöntihäkin osat: Ankkurointisarja; Pysäytysverkko; Kantolaukku; Kehikko; Maakiilat; Asennustarvikkeet; Verkko; Syöttökoneen valjaat; Tolpat; Muu
it: Componenti della gabbia di battuta inclusi: Kit di ancoraggio; Rete di protezione interna; Borsa per il trasporto; Telaio; Picchetti da terra; Hardware di installazione; Rete; Imbracatura per macchina lanciapalle; Pali; Altro
sk-SK: Vrátane súčastí odpaľovacej klietky: Upevňovacia súprava; Tlmiaca sieť; Taška na prenášanie; Rám; Zemné kolíky; Inštalačný hardvér; Sieť; Popruh na nadhadzovací stroj; Tyče; Iné
ko: 배팅 케이지 포함 구성품: 앵커 키트; 배플 네트; 캐리 백; 프레임; 고정용 말뚝; 설치 하드웨어; 네트; 피칭 머신 하네스; 폴; 기타
ru: Состав компонентов тренировочной клетки для бейсбола: Набор анкеров; Гасящая сетка; Сумка для переноски; Каркас; Колышки для крепления в грунт; Крепеж для установки; Сетка; Защита для питчинг-машины; Стойки; Другое
cs: Obsažené součásti pálkařské sítě: Kotevní sada; Tlumící síť; Přenosná taška; Rám; Zemní kolíky; Instalační hardware; Síť; Postroj pro nadhazovací stroj; Tyče; Jiné
pt-BR: Componentes da gaiola de rebatidas incluídos: Kit de ancoragem; Rede de proteção; Bolsa de transporte; Estrutura; Estacas de fixação; Equipamentos de instalação; Rede; Arnês para máquina de arremesso; Mastros; Outros
ro-RO: Componente incluse pentru cușca de bătut: Kit de ancorare; Plasă de protecție (Baffle); Geantă de transport; Cadru; Țăruși de fixare; Accesorii de instalare; Plasă; Harnașament pentru mașina de aruncat mingi; Stâlpi; Altele
nb: Inkluderte deler i sikkerhetsbur til baseballslag: Forankringssett; Baffelnett; Bæreveske; Ramme; Jordplugger; Monteringsutstyr; Nett; Kastemaskinsele; Stenger; Annet
es: Componentes de la jaula de bateo incluidos: Kit de anclaje; Red deflectora; Bolsa de transporte; Estructura; Estacas de tierra; Hardware de instalación; Red; Arnés para máquina de lanzar; Postes; Otro
pl: Dołączono elementy tunelu baseballowego: Zestaw kotew; Siatka tłumiąca; Torba do przenoszenia; Rama; Śledzie; Okucia montażowe; Siatka; Uprząż do maszyny miotającej; Słupki; Inne
fr: Composants de la cage de frappe inclus: Kit d’ancrage; Filet anti-rebond; Sac de transport; Cadre; Piquets de sol; Matériel d'installation; Filet; Harnais de lance-balles; Poteaux; Autre
el: Περιλαμβάνονται εξαρτήματα κλωβού χτυπημάτων: Κιτ αγκύρωσης; Δίχτυ απόσβεσης; Τσάντα μεταφοράς; Σκελετός; Πασσαλάκια εδάφους; Υλικός εξοπλισμός εγκατάστασης; Δίχτυ; Ιμάντες μηχανήματος ρίψης; Στύλοι; Άλλο
zh-TW: 包含打擊籠組件: 固定套件; 緩衝網; 提袋; 框架; 地釘; 安裝五金; 網子; 發球機固定帶; 支桿; 其他
hr-HR: Uključene komponente za kavez za udaranje: Komplet za pričvršćivanje; Zaštitna mreža; Torba za nošenje; Okvir; Klinovi za tlo; Hardver za ugradnju; Mreža; Pojas za stroj za bacanje loptica; Stupovi; Ostalo
sv: Komponenter för slagbur som ingår: Förankringssats; Dämparnät; Bärväska; Ram; Markpinnar; Monteringsutrustning; Nät; Sele för kastmaskin; Stolpar; Övrigt
ja: バッティングケージコンポーネント付き: アンカーキット; バッフルネット; キャリーバッグ; フレーム; グラウンドステーク; 設置用ハードウェア; ネット; ピッチングマシン用ハーネス; ポール; その他